Georgia, session 2025_26, HB18.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-2-161.3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Dual
Enrollment Act, purpose, dual credit courses, eligibility for participation, and eligibility for
payment, is amended by revising paragraph (9) of subsection (b) as follows:
"(9) 'Eligible high school student' means a student who meets residency requirements to
be classified as a legal resident of Georgia as established pursuant to regulations of the
commission, who remains a resident of the state while participating in the program, and
who is:
(A) Entering or enrolled in eleventh or twelfth grade at an eligible high school taking
any eligible dual credit course at any eligible postsecondary institution; or
H. B. 18
- 1 -

LC 49 2018
(B) Entering or enrolled in tenth grade at an eligible high school when such student:
(i) Is enrolled in an eligible CTAE course at an institution within the Technical
College System of Georgia;
(ii) Has obtained prior to the beginning of the term of dual enrollment coursework
an SAT or ACT test score that would meet the assessment requirements of a Zell
Miller Scholar pursuant to division (27)(A)(i) of Code Section 20-3-519 and is taking
eligible core courses at any eligible postsecondary institution; or
(iii) Was enrolled as a ninth grader in one or more dual credit courses at an eligible
postsecondary institution for which payment was made under this part on or before
June 30, 2020."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall apply to all school years beginning
on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 18
- 2 -